COMMENTS ON TROUBLE SYMPTOM
  • Failure is possibly caused by failed ignition system, improper air-fuel ratio, improper compression pressure or other faults.
PROBABLE CAUSE
  • Failed air-fuel ratio control system
  • Failed ignition system
  • Failed fuel system
  • Failed intake and exhaust system
  • Failed emission control system
  • Throttle valve fouled
  • Improper compression pressure
  • Failed engine-A/T-ECU
STEP 2. Check injector for operating sound.
Q: Can operating sound be heard?
YES:  Go to Step 3 .
NO: 
  • Check the injector system of the defective cylinder.
  • (Refer to code No. P0201: No. 1 injector system )
  • (Refer to code No. P0202: No. 2 injector system )
  • (Refer to code No. P0203: No. 3 injector system )
  • (Refer to code No. P0204: No. 4 injector system )
STEP 3. MUT-II/III data list
    1. Item 13: Intake air temperature sensor
    1. Item 14: Throttle position sensor
    1. Item 21: Engine coolant temperature sensor
Q: Are the check results normal?
YES:  Go to Step 4 .
NO:  Perform the diagnosis code classified check Procedure for the sensor that has shown an abnormal data value (Refer to Inspection Chart for Diagnosis Codes ).
STEP 7. MUT-II/III data list
    1. Item 11: Oxygen sensor (front)
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 8 .
NO:  Check oxygen sensor system (front) (Refer to Code No. P0130 ).
   
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 9 .
NO:  Repair.
STEP 11. Check spark plug cable itself.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 12 .
NO:  Replace spark plug cable.
STEP 12. Check ignition coil itself.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 13 .
NO:  Replace ignition coil.
       
  • Check earthing line for open circuit and damage.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES: 
  • Check and repair harness between terminal No. 3 of ignition coil connector of each cylinder and C-112 engine-A/T-ECU.
    • Check signal line for open or short circuit or damage.
NO:  Repair.
STEP 15. Measure fuel pressure.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 16 .
NO:  Repair.
STEP 16. Check compression pressure.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Replace engine-A/T-ECU.
NO:  Repair.
©2004 Mitsubishi Motors Corporation